Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
CHAPTER 352 Mining Regulations

352.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Abandoned workings” means excavations, either caved or sealed, that are deserted and in which further mining is not intended, or open workings which are ventilated and not inspected regularly;

“Active workings” means all places in a mine that are ventilated and inspected regularly;

“Approved” means that a device, apparatus, equipment, machinery, or practice employed in the mining of coal has been approved by the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources;

“Assistant mine foreman” means a certified person designated to assist the mine foreman in the supervision of a portion or the whole of a mine or of the persons employed therein;

“Commercial mine” means any coal mine from which coal is mined for sale, commercial use, or exchange. This term shall in no instance be construed to include a mine where coal is produced for own use;

“Commissioner” means commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources;

“Department” means the Department for Natural Resources;

“Drift” means an opening through strata or coal seams with opening grades sufficient to permit coal to be hauled therefrom, or which is used for the purpose of ventilation, drainage, ingress, egress, and other purposes in connection with the mining of coal;

“Director” means the director of the Division of Mine Safety;

“Excavations and workings” means the excavated portions of a mine;

“Face equipment” means mobile or portable mining machinery having electric motors or accessory equipment normally installed or operated in by the last open crosscut in any entry or room;

“Fire boss” (often referred to as mine examiner) means a person certified as a mine foreman or assistant mine foreman who is designated by management to examine a mine or part of a mine for explosive gas or other dangers before a shift crew enters;

“Gassy mine.” All underground mines shall be classified as gassy or gaseous;

“High voltage” means any voltage of one thousand (1,000) volts or more;

“Imminent danger” means the existence of any condition or practice which could reasonably be expected to cause death or serious physical injury before the condition or practice can be abated;

“Inactive workings” shall include all portions of a mine in which operations have been suspended for an indefinite period, but have not been abandoned;

“Intake air” means air that has not passed through the last working place of the split or by the unsealed entrances to abandoned workings and by analysis contains not less than nineteen and one-half percent (19.5%) of oxygen, no dangerous quantities of flammable gas, and no harmful amounts of poisonous gas or dust;

“Licensee” means any owner, operator, lessee, corporation, partnership, or other person who procures a license from the department to operate a coal mine;

“Low voltage” means up to and including six hundred sixty (660) volts;

“Medium voltage” means voltages greater than six hundred sixty (660) and up to nine hundred ninety-nine (999) volts;

“Mine” means any open pit or any underground workings from which coal is produced for sale, exchange, or commercial use, and all shafts, slopes, drifts, or inclines leading thereto, and includes all buildings and equipment, above or below the surface of the ground, used in connection with the workings. Workings that are adjacent to each other and under the same management and which are administered as distinct units shall be considered separate mines;

“Mine foreman” means a certified person whom the licensee, mine manager, or superintendent places in charge of the workings of the mine and of persons employed therein;

“Mine manager” means a certified or noncertified person whom the licensee places in charge of a mine or mines and whose duties include but are not limited to operations at the mine or mines and supervision of personnel when qualified to do so;

“NAD 83” means the North American Datum, 1983 version, in feet units;

“Open-pit mine” shall include open excavations and open-cut workings including auger operations and highwall mining systems for the extraction of coal. However, excavation of refuse from a coarse coal refuse fill for reprocessing of the refuse, which is permitted and bonded under KRS Chapter 350 and is regulated by the Mine Safety and Health Administration, shall not be required to obtain a license under this chapter;

“Operator” means the licensee, owner, lessee, or other person who operates or controls a coal mine;

“Permissible” means that any equipment, device, or explosive that has been approved by the United States Bureau of Mines, the Mining Enforcement and Safety Administration, or the Mine Safety and Health Administration meets all requirements, restrictions, exceptions, limitations, and conditions attached to the classification;

“Preshift examination” refers to the examination of an underground mine or part of a mine where miners are scheduled to work or travel, and shall be conducted not more than three (3) hours before any oncoming shift;

“Return air” means air that has passed through the last active working place on each split, or air that has passed through abandoned, inaccessible, or pillared workings;

“Serious physical injury” means an injury which has a reasonable potential to cause death;

“Shaft” means a vertical opening through the strata that is or may be used, in connection with the mining of coal, for the purpose of ventilation or drainage, or for hoisting men, coal, or materials;

“Single Zone Projection” means the Kentucky Single Zone State Plane Coordinate System of 1983, based on the Lambert Conformal Conical map projection with double standard parallels on the North American Datum, 1983 version, as established in 10 KAR 5:010;

“Slope” means an inclined opening used for the same purpose as a shaft;

“Superintendent” means the person who, on behalf of the licensee, has immediate supervision of one (1) or more mines;

“Supervisory personnel” shall mean a person or persons certified under the provisions of KRS Chapter 351 to assist in the supervision of a portion or the whole of the mine or of the persons employed therein;

“Tipple or dumping point” means the structure where coal is dumped or unloaded from the mine car into railroad cars, trucks, wagons, or other means of conveyance;

“Working face” means any place in a coal mine at which the extraction of coal from its natural deposit in the earth is performed during the mining cycle;

“Working place” means the area of a coal mine inby the last open crosscut;

“Working section” means all areas of a coal mine from the loading point to and including the working faces; and

“Workmanlike manner” means consistent with established practices and methods utilized in the coal industry.

The definitions in KRS

351.010

apply also to this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise.

Except as the context otherwise requires, this chapter applies only to commercial mines as defined in KRS

351.010

and shall not apply to electrical facilities owned, operated, or otherwise controlled by a retail electric supplier or generation and transmission cooperative as defined in KRS

278.010

or organized under KRS Chapter 279 for the purpose of communication, metering, or for the generation, control, transformation, transmission, and distribution of electric energy located in buildings used exclusively by utilities for such purposes or located outdoors on property owned or leased by the utility or on public highways, streets, roads, or outdoors by established easement rights on private property and that are covered by the National Electric Safety Code (NESC) or other applicable safety codes, or other authorities having jurisdiction and shall not apply to installations under the exclusive control of utilities for the purpose of communication, metering, or for the generation, control, transformation, transmission, and distribution of electric energy located in buildings used exclusively by utilities for such purposes or located outdoors on property owned or leased by the utility or on public highways, streets, roads, or outdoors by established rights on private property.

History.

2739-1: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 255, § 258; 1972, ch. 303, § 1; 1974, ch. 308, § 61; 1976, ch. 174, § 4; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 19; 1978, ch. 301, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 308, § 21, effective April 9, 1996; 1998, ch. 480, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 355, § 8, effective July 15, 2002; 2004, ch. 37, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 123, § 62, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 185, § 13, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 241, § 19, effective July 12, 2006; 2009, ch. 79, § 12, effective June 25, 2009; 2015 ch. 87, § 28, effective June 24, 2015; 2017 ch. 117, § 41, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 100, § 2, effective July 15, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.015.
Moratorium on regulations — Exceptions. [Repealed.]

352.018.
Required maps and plans — Format.

All maps and plans required under this chapter shall be submitted by the coal operator providing coordinates in feet units using NAD 83, with Single Zone Projection, as those terms are defined in KRS

352.010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 79, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

352.020.
Mine ventilation plans — Methods of ventilation — Amount of air required — Plan requirements.

A mine ventilation plan and any revision of an existing mine ventilation plan shall be suitable to the ventilation conditions and mining system of each mine. The mine ventilation plan and any revisions to the mine ventilation plan approved by the United States Mine Safety and Health Administration shall be submitted to the director or his or her authorized representative and incorporated into the license. All mine ventilation plans shall be set forth in printed form. The mine ventilation plan shall require the air quality throughout the mine to contain at least nineteen and one-half percent (19.5%) oxygen and not more than one-half of one percent (0.5%) of carbon dioxide, and the volume and velocity of the air current shall be sufficient to dilute, render harmless, and carry away flammable, explosive, noxious, and harmful gases and dust, smoke, and fumes. A copy of the mine ventilation plan and any revisions to that plan shall be available to the miners and their representatives.

The ventilation of all underground coal mines shall be produced by means of mechanically operated fans located outside the mine in fireproof housing and offset at least fifteen (15) feet to one (1) side or above the opening, protected by explosion doors or weak walls and arranged so that ventilating current may be reversed if necessary. The fan shall be installed so as to prevent recirculation of mine air. The main fan shall be operated from a power circuit independent from the mine circuit. If inside auxiliary fans are required to ventilate working places the commissioner must first approve the installation.

The licensee, superintendent, or foreman of every coal mine worked by shaft, slope, or drift shall provide and maintain for every mine two (2) separate and distinct escapeways, one (1) of which is vented by the intake air. However, if a mine was originally licensed prior to January 1, 1990, the commissioner may approve an alternate ventilation plan. Each active working section shall be ventilated by a separate split of intake air. In all mines the quantity of air passing through the last open crosscut between the intake and return in any pair or sets of entries shall be not less than nine thousand (9,000) cubic feet of air per minute and as much more as is necessary to dilute and render harmless and carry away flammable and harmful gases. All working faces from which coal is being cut, mined, or loaded in a working section between the intake and return airway entries shall be ventilated with a minimum quantity of three thousand (3,000) cubic feet of air per minute and as much more as is necessary to dilute and render harmless and carry away flammable and harmful gases. The quantity of air reaching the last crosscut in pillar sections may be less than nine thousand (9,000) cubic feet of air per minute if at least nine thousand (9,000) cubic feet of air per minute is being delivered to the intake of the pillar line. The air current shall under any conditions have a sufficient volume and velocity to reduce and carry away smoke from blasting and any flammable or harmful gases.

All mines shall maintain at least nine thousand (9,000) cubic feet of air per minute at the points mentioned in subsection (3) of this section. The commissioner shall have the authority to require additional air in any mine when he deems it necessary for the safety of the employees.

When the air from a split has passed through and has ventilated all the working places in an air split of a mine it shall then be designated as return air. Return-air courses shall not be designated as primary escapeways.

As working places advance, breakthroughs for air shall be made not more than ninety (90) feet apart, except that where longwall or modern systems of mining are used the commissioner or his authorized representative may approve a greater distance between breakthroughs or the method of ventilating such longwall or modern systems of mining. If any breakthroughs between intake and return airways are not required for the passage of air or the travel of equipment, they shall be closed with stoppings. All permanent stoppings shall be substantially built with suitable incombustible or fire resistant material subject to the approval of the mine inspector so as to keep the working places well ventilated. All brattice cloth and ventilation tubing shall be flame resistant. Doors on the main haulways shall be avoided where practicable, and overcasts, built of concrete or other suitable material and of ample strength, shall be adopted. Where doors are used they shall be built in a substantial manner, and shall be hung so as to close automatically when unobstructed.

In a mine where methane can be found to an extent of one percent (1%) or more on the return of any one (1) split, the mine safety specialist, with the approval of the commissioner, may require the mine to be ventilated by the exhaust system, requiring the haulage roads and all feed wires to be located on the intake air and the electrical system to be so arranged that no wires carrying electrical current shall be on return air. A period of not more than ninety (90) days from date of notification shall be allowed to make the changes required.

The ventilation plan shall require all fans utilized in the ventilation plan to be in continuous operation unless the fan must be turned off for repairs or maintenance, during which time all persons must be withdrawn from the mine. After the mine fan is restarted following the completion of repairs or maintenance, it must be in operation for a sufficient period to ensure air quality and the equalization of the mine atmosphere. Within fifteen (15) minutes after a fan has been unintentionally stopped, all miners must begin withdrawing from the mine. If the fan is restarted before the miners reach the surface, the miners shall remain at the point of their retreat, and the area inby shall be preshifted prior to the miners returning to the section.

HISTORY:

2739-19: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 15; 1972, ch. 303, § 2; 1976, ch. 174, § 5; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 20; 1996, ch. 308, § 22, effective April 9, 1996; 2002, ch. 355, § 9, effective July 15, 2002; 2006, ch. 185, § 14, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 94, § 12, effective June 26, 2007; 2015 ch. 87, § 29, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.030.
Number of persons permitted to work in same air current or split-ventilation — Repair.

As many as sixty (60) persons may work in the same air current or split, and with the approval of the mine inspector and the commissioner, as many as eighty (80) persons may work in the same air current. Each active section in a mine shall be ventilated by a separate split of intake air. Every mine, and all portions thereof, shall be ventilated by one (1) or more currents of air, which shall contain not less than nineteen and one-half percent (19.5%) of oxygen, nor any dangerous quantities of flammable gas, nor any harmful amount of poisonous gases or dust, when the current of air enters into each split. The ventilation shall be sufficient to prevent methane accumulations, so far as practicable, and to keep the methane percentage in the return of any split to not more than two percent (2%).

The ventilating current shall be circulated through the haulageways, travelways, and airways to reach all portions of the mine, except sealed sections; and it shall be circulated through the entries and rooms around the ends of line brattice and along pillar lines. It shall be conducted to the last breakthrough, or to the working faces if required, by means of stoppings, check doors, curtains, and brattice that may be necessary or required, in order to dilute, render harmless, and carry away the noxious and dangerous gases, smoke, and dust liberated therein, and to supply a sufficient quantity of ventilation for all emergencies. The ventilating current in the area of a mine’s belt entries shall be directed to an air return before the ventilating current reaches the face area, unless the department, under certain conditions issues a permit for belt air to be used at the coal face. The department shall render a final written decision within sixty (60) calendar days of receipt of the permit application.

When mine ventilation, formerly satisfactory and adequate, becomes deficient in quality or quantity, the department shall have authority to order improvement of the ventilation.

No licensee, superintendent, or mine foreman shall permit any person to work at a place where sufficient ventilation cannot be maintained, except persons employed to make the places of employment safe in compliance with the requirements of this chapter, and while repair work necessary to comply with the requirements is in progress no person shall be permitted to enter that part of the mine affected except those actually employed in doing the repair work. The repair work shall be done under the constant supervision of a certified official designated by the mine foreman.

Each licensee shall adopt a plan which shall provide that when any mine fan stops, immediate action shall be taken by the licensee or his agent:

To withdraw all persons from the working sections;

To cut off the power in the mine in a timely manner;

To provide for restoration of power and resumption of work if ventilation is restored within a reasonable period, of not more than fifteen (15) minutes, as set forth in the plan after the working places and other active workings where methane is likely to accumulate are reexamined by a certified person to determine if methane in amounts of one percent (1%) or more exists therein; and

To provide for withdrawal of all persons from the mine if ventilation cannot be restored within a reasonable time, of not more than fifteen (15) minutes.

The plan and revisions thereof approved by the commissioner or his authorized representative shall be set out in printed form and a copy shall be furnished to the commissioner or his authorized representative.

History.

2739-19: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 120, § 6; 1952, ch. 162, § 16; 1972, ch. 303, § 3; 1976, ch. 174, § 6; 1990, ch. 243, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 308, § 23, effective April 9, 1996; 2002, ch. 355, § 10, effective July 15, 2002.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.040.
Working places not to be driven in advance of air current.

If the mine inspector discovers any working place being driven in advance of the air current contrary to the requirements of this chapter he shall notify the mine foreman to cease work in the place at once and not resume such work until the law is complied with.

History.

2739-19: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 4.

352.045.
Cutting or welding inby last open break prohibited.

There shall be no cutting or welding inby the last open break, except in case of emergency.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 200, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

352.050.
Permissible rating for underground machinery — Transportation of underground mining equipment.

After June 16, 1972, no machinery powered by an internal combustion engine shall be placed in use in underground workings unless the equipment is rated “permissible” as described in KRS

352.010

for underground use, and the use of the machinery is approved by the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources.

Mining equipment being transported or trammed underground, where energized trolley wires or trolley feeder wires are present, other than ordinary sectional movements, shall be transported or trammed by qualified personnel under the supervision of a certified foreman. When the equipment is being transported or trammed, no person, except those persons directly engaged in moving the equipment, shall be permitted to be in by the equipment in the ventilating split that is passing over the equipment. To avoid accidental contact with power lines, face equipment shall be insulated and assemblies removed, if necessary, so as to provide clearance.

History.

2739-19, 2739-29, 2739-30: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 17; 1972, ch. 303, § 5; 1976, ch. 174, § 7; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 21; 1996, ch. 308, § 24, effective April 9, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(8/21/2008). 2005 Ky. Acts chs. 11, 85, 95, 97, 98, 99, 123, and 181 instruct the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in 2005 legislation confirming the reorganization of the executive branch. One such correction that was overlooked during codification after the 2005 Regular Session of the General Assembly has been made in this section.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

(4/9/96). The use of KRS

352.010

in subsection (1) of this statute results from KRS 7.136(1)(h). Section 24 of 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 reads “Section 19 of this Act” here, but this internal reference was not adjusted to reflect the addition of two new sections to House Bill 605 prior to Section 19 in the Senate Committee Substitute adopted for this bill. This fact, taken together with the context of the citation, clearly indicates that Section 21 should have been substituted here so that KRS

352.010

is the appropriate statute to be cited.

352.060.
Rock-dusting.

The following rules shall govern in the rock-dusting of mines:

All mines, or parts of mines, or sections thereof, shall be rock-dusted if conditions are found to be dusty or hazardous, after proper inspection. In the event such conditions are found to exist, then the commissioner or his authorized representative shall require the necessary rock-dusting to make the mine, part of the mine, or section safe.

In all mines, accumulations of excessive loose coal and fine dry coal dust shall be removed from the mine, and all operating sections kept thoroughly rock-dusted, and the dust on the mine floor allayed by methods approved by the commissioner, but in every mine, or in any part or section thereof, rock-dusting shall be applied to maintain at all times a minimum percentage of sixty-five percent (65%) of noncombustible matter to within forty (40) feet of the faces, including last open crosscuts, and under certain special conditions the department may require that places be rock-dusted to the faces, and that additional rock-dust be added.

History.

2739-20: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 120, § 7; 1952, ch. 162, § 18; 1972, ch. 303, § 6; 1976, ch. 174, § 8; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 8, § 22; 1996, ch. 308, § 25, effective April 9, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.070.
Checking employees in and out.

The licensee or superintendent of every underground mine shall install a uniform system of checking the employees in and out of the mine. Each employee shall have a positive means of identification upon his person while inside the mine and a record shall be kept on the surface of all persons underground at all times.

History.

2739-22: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 7; 1996, ch. 308, § 26, effective April 9 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.080.
New or additional openings — Map to be filed.

No new or additional openings to any underground mine shall be made without the approval of the commissioner.

Each operator or superintendent of an underground mine shall, before making any new or additional opening submit to the commissioner of the department, for his information and approval, a map or plan showing the proposed systems of mining the coal seam, the proposed system of ventilation and equipment of the openings, and their locations and relative positions to adjacent developments.

History.

2739-19: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 8.

352.090.
Abandoned parts of mine to be posted — Sealing.

All unused workings and abandoned parts of mines shall be protected by safeguards that will prevent the accumulation or overflow of gas, and all avenues leading thereto shall be so arranged and conducted as to give warning to all persons of the danger of entering, and notice shall be posted warning all unauthorized persons not to enter these parts of the mine. If the area cannot be adequately ventilated, and examined, or evaluated it shall be sealed in a timely manner.

No person, except persons authorized to make examination thereof, shall enter any unused or abandoned part of a mine after the warning has been posted.

Where the practice is to seal abandoned workings, the sealing shall be done in accordance with a mine seal construction plan approved by MSHA and submitted to the Division of Mine Safety. Seal construction shall be done immediately in an effective manner with noncombustible material. In every sealed area, one (1) or more of the seals shall be fitted with a pipe and cap or valve to permit the gases behind the seals to be sampled and also to provide a means of determining any existing hydrostatic pressure. When required by the mine inspector and commissioner, drill holes shall be extended from the surface to the sealed area, or vent pipes shall be extended from the sealed area to a return air course. Sufficient ventilation shall be provided at each seal to prevent dangerous gases from accumulating.

HISTORY:

2739-19: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 19; 1972, ch. 303, § 9; 1976, ch. 174, § 9; 1996, ch. 308, § 27, effective April 9, 1996; 2002, ch. 355, § 11, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 94, § 13, effective June 26, 2007; 2015 ch. 87, § 30, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.100.
Abandoned mine not to be entered — Exception.

No person shall attempt to enter, explore, or survey an abandoned mine or portion thereof without the approval of the mine inspector or the commissioner and unless he adheres to conditions prescribed by the commissioner.

History.

2739-28: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 10; 2002, ch. 355, § 12, effective July 15, 2002.

352.110.
Mines to have two openings — Exception — Condemnation of land for opening.

No licensee, superintendent, mine manager, or mine foreman of any mine opened after June 16, 1972, shall permit persons to work therein unless there are to every seam of coal worked in the mine at least two (2) separate outlets, separated by natural strata of not less than one hundred fifty (150) feet in breadth if the mine is worked by shaft or slope, and separated by a pillar of natural strata of not less than two thousand (2,000) square feet if the mine is worked by drift, by which outlets distinct means of ingress and egress are readily available to persons employed in the mine, but it shall not be necessary for the two (2) outlets to belong to the same mine. This subsection does not apply to the openings of a new entry that is being worked for the purpose of making connection between the two (2) outlets so long as not more than twenty (20) persons are employed at one (1) time in making the connection or driving the second opening, or to any mine in which the second opening has been rendered unavailable by reason of final robbing or removal of pillars so long as not more than twenty (20) persons are employed therein at one (1) time, and the workings are no farther than five hundred (500) feet from the bottom of the shaft or slope or from the drift opening.

If any mine has but one (1) means of ingress or egress for persons employed therein, and the owner does not own suitable ground for another opening, the owner may select appropriate adjacent ground for that purpose and have it condemned pursuant to the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

2739-21: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 20; 1972, ch. 303, § 11; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 279, effective January 2, 1978; 1996, ch. 308, § 28, effective April 9, 1996; 2006, ch. 185, § 15, effective July 12, 2006.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Underground passageway to mine, condemnation
of use of, KRS

381.635

,

381.636

.

352.120.
Stairways or hoisting devices in shafts — Passageways to be unobstructed — Direction signs — Height and width of escapeway outlets.

In every shaft designated as an escape outlet there shall be provided a stairway or ladderway of suitable strength, design, and angle, with platforms or landings at each turn, the stairway or ladderway to be approved by the mine inspector, or in lieu thereof a properly equipped hoisting arrangement, consisting of facilities suitable for hoisting men, a wire hoisting rope of ample strength, and an adequate and safe hoisting engine and drum, which hoisting arrangement shall be ready for use at any time of emergency.

All shafts by which men enter or leave the mine and all passageways to escape outlets shall be carefully examined by the mine foreman, or by a person designated by him, at least once each week that the mine is operating, and the date and findings of the examination shall be entered in a book at the mine and for that purpose.

No debris, water, or other material that would obstruct the free passage of men shall be allowed to accumulate in the passageway to the escape outlet, and if any obstructions accumulate or exist they shall be promptly removed.

At points where the passageway to the escape outlet is intersected by roadways or entries calculated to produce doubt as to the proper direction to the outlet, conspicuous signboards shall be placed indicating the direction to escape outlets.

The height of the escapeway outlets shall be maintained to at least the height of the coal seam and at least six (6) feet in width, where practicable.

History.

2739-21: amend. Acts 1972, ch. 303, § 12; 1996, ch. 308, § 29, effective April 9, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.

352.130.
Safety and hoisting devices in shafts — Certified hoistman.

At every mine operated by shaft, there shall be an approved safety catch, and on all cages used for lowering and hoisting persons there shall be a sufficient and substantial overhead cover. At the top of each shaft a safety gate shall be provided. An adequate brake, so adjusted that it may be operated by the engineer without leaving his post at the levers, shall be attached to every drum or equivalent machine used for lowering or raising persons at any shaft or slope, and in connection with the hoisting engine an efficient indicator or dial, which will show the engineer the positions of the cages in the shaft at any time, shall be used. An effective means of communication from the bottom of the shaft or slope to the hoisting engineer shall be provided.

Cages and incline cars on which men are transported shall be raised or lowered at a rate of speed consistent with the equipment and the physical conditions of the mine, subject to the approval of the mine inspector.

The hoisting rope, the safety catches, and the cage attachments shall be examined daily by the mine foreman, or by some competent person designated by him, and care shall be taken to keep them in good working condition at all times.

No person shall ride on any cage when coal, slate, or similar material is being raised.

No person shall enter a cage at the bottom to be raised to the top during the running hours of the mine, or when leaving work at the close of the day’s run, without first being authorized by the bottom man or cager to do so, the bottom man or cager having first signaled to the engineer that men are to be raised.

At every underground landing where persons enter or leave the cage and where persons must pass from one side of the shaft to the other there shall be a passageway not less than three (3) feet wide and of suitable height, kept free from obstruction and as dry as possible, around the shaft; and all employees when passing from one side of the shaft to the other side shall use the passageway only.

Hoisting ropes on all cages or trips shall be adequate in size to handle the load and have a proper factor of safety. Ropes used to hoist or lower coal and other materials shall have a factor of safety of not less than five (5) to one (1); ropes used to hoist or lower men shall have a factor of safety of not less than ten (10) to one (1). Load tests shall be made at least once each month and a record kept. The rope shall be replaced as soon as there is evidence of possible failure.

Any rope attached to a cage, man-car, or trip used for hoisting or lowering men shall be provided with two (2) bridle chains or cables connected securely to the rope at least three (3) feet above the socket or thimble and to the crosspiece of the cage or to the man-car or trip.

A certified hoistman shall be on the mine site of a shaft or slope mine when persons are underground, including fire bosses and pumpers on idle shifts, except when automatic, self-service facilities with all safety devices are provided.

History.

2739-21: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 162, § 21; 1972, ch. 303, § 13; 1982, ch. 201, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1996, ch. 308, § 30, effective April 9, 1996.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(4/9/96). The action taken with respect to this statute by 1996 Ky. Acts ch. 308 was to have become effective April 8, 1996, under Section 51 of that Act. The Act, however, did not become effective until April 9, 1996, when the Governor’s signed copy of the Act was filed with the Secretary of State.